New York, session 2025-2026, A1992.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2854 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. Compensation of executives. Compensation paid or given to any exec- 4 utive of a charter school approved by the board of regents shall not 5 exceed one hundred ninety-nine thousand dollars per year where such 6 compensation is provided through state funding. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04707-01-5